District of Columbia statutes.
16-3910

Other rights of judgment creditor.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or the rules of the court, a party obtaining a judgment in the Small Claims and Conciliation Branch is entitled to the same remedies, processes, costs, and benefits as are given or inure to other judgment creditors in the court.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 611, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(p)(7)
1981 Ed., § 16-3910.
1973 Ed., § 16-3910.